Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.090

Record of fires.

The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall keep on file all reports of fires made to him or her pursuant to this code. Such records shall at all times during business hours be open to public inspection; except, that any testimony taken in a fire investigation may, in the discretion of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, be withheld from public scrutiny. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, may destroy any such report after five years from its date.

[ 1995 c 369 s 32; 1986 c 266 s 75; 1985 c 470 s 25; 1947 c 79 s .33.09; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 45.33.09. Formerly RCW 48.48.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.